Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.6, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1290.6.
PROHIBITED AMMUNITION
Any concealed or unconcealed handgun when carried in a manner
authorized by the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and
Req. No. 15954 Page 1

when loaded with any ammunition which is either a restricted bullet
as defined by Section 1289.19 of this title or is larger than .45
caliber or is otherwise prohibited by law shall be deemed a
prohibited weapon for purposes of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act.
Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be
punished for a criminal offense as provided by Section 1272 of this
title or any other applicable provision of law. In addition to any
criminal prosecution for a violation of the provisions of this
section, the licensee shall be subject to an administrative fine of
Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), upon a hearing and determination by
the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation that the person is in
violation of the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.9, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1290.9.
ELIGIBILITY
The following requirements shall apply to any person making
application to the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation for a
handgun license pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-
Defense Act. The person must:
1. Be a citizen of the United States with established residency
in the State of Oklahoma; or
2. Be a lawful permanent resident in the United States and have
established residency in the State of Oklahoma.
Req. No. 15954 Page 2

For purposes of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act:
a. the term "residency" shall apply to any person who
either possesses a valid Oklahoma driver license or
state photo identification card, and physically
maintains a residence in this state or to any person,
including the spouse of such person, who has permanent
military orders within this state and possesses a
valid driver license from another state where such
person and spouse of such person claim residency, and
b. the term "lawful permanent resident" shall mean a
noncitizen who is lawfully authorized to live
permanently within the United States;
3. Be at least:
a. twenty-one (21) years of age, or
b. eighteen (18) years of age but not yet twenty-one (21)
years of age and the person is a member or veteran of
the United States Armed Forces, the Reserves or
National Guard, or the person was discharged under
honorable conditions from the United States Armed
Forces, Reserves or National Guard;
4. Complete a firearms safety and training course and
demonstrate competence and qualifications with the type of pistol to
be carried by the person as provided in Section 1290.14 of this
title, and submit proof of training and qualification or an
Req. No. 15954 Page 3

exem ption for training and qualification as authorized by Section
1290.14 of this title;
5. Submit the required fee and complete the application process
as provided in Section 1290.12 of this title; and
6. 5. Comply in good faith with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Self-Defense Act.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.12, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1290.12.
PROCEDURE FOR APPLICATION
A. Except as provided in paragraph 11 10 of this subsection,
the procedure for applying for a handgun license and processing the
application shall be as follows:
1. An eligible person may request an application packet for a
handgun license from the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation or
the county sheriff's office either in person or by mail. The Bureau
may provide application packets to each sheriff not exceeding two
hundred packets per request. The Bureau shall provide the following
information in the application packet:
a. an application form,
b. procedures to follow to process the application form,
and
c. if available, a copy of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act
with any modifications thereto;
Req. No. 15954 Page 4

2. The person shall be required to successfully complete a
firearms safety and training course from a firearms instructor who
is approved and registered in this state as provided in Section
1290.14 of this title or from an interactive online firearms safety
and training course available electronically via the Internet which
has been approved as to curriculum by the Council on Law Enforcement
Education and Training, and the person shall be required to
demonstrate competency and qualification with a pistol authorized
for concealed or unconcealed carry by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act.
The original certificate of successful completion of a firearms
safety and training course and an original certificate of successful
demonstration of competency and qualification to carry and handle a
pistol or exemption from training certificate shall be submitted
with the application for a handgun license. No duplicate, copy,
facsimile or other reproduction of the certificate of training,
certificate of competency and qualification or exemption from
training certificate shall be acceptable as proof of training as
required by the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act;
3. The application form shall be completed and delivered by the
applicant, in person, to the sheriff of the county wherein the
applicant resides;
4. 3. The person shall deliver to the sheriff at the time of
delivery of the completed application form a fee of One Hundred
Dollars ($100.00) for processing the application through the
Req. No. 15954 Page 5

Okla homa State Bureau of Investigation and processing the required
fingerprints through the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The
processing fee shall be in the form of:
a. a money order or a cashier's check made payable to the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation,
b. a nationally recognized credit card issued to the
applicant. For purposes of this paragraph,
"nationally recognized credit card" means any
instrument or device, whether known as a credit card,
credit plate, charge plate, or by any other name,
issued with or without fee by the issuer for the use
of the cardholder in obtaining goods, services, or
anything else of value on credit which is accepted by
over one thousand merchants in the state. The
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall determine
which nationally recognized credit cards will be
accepted by the Bureau, or
c. electronic funds transfer.
Any person paying application fees to the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation by means of a nationally recognized credit card or by
means of an electronic funds transfer shall be required to complete
and submit his or her application through the online application
process of the Bureau.

Req. No. 15954 Page 6

The processing fee shall not be refundable in the event of a
denial of a handgun license or any suspension or revocation
subsequent to the issuance of a license. Persons making application
for a firearms instructor shall not be required to pay the
application fee as provided in this section, but shall be required
to pay the costs provided in paragraphs 6 5 and 8 7 of this
subsection;
5. 4. The completed application form shall be signed by the
applicant in person before the sheriff. The signature shall be
given voluntarily upon a sworn oath that the person knows the
contents of the application and that the information contained in
the application is true and correct. Any person making any false or
misleading statement on an application for a handgun license shall,
upon conviction, be guilty of perjury as defined by Section 491 of
this title. Any conviction shall be punished as provided in Section
500 of this title. In addition to a criminal conviction, the person
shall be denied the right to have a handgun license pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1290.10 of this title and the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation shall revoke the handgun license, if issued;
6. 5. Two passport-size photographs of the applicant shall be
submitted with the completed application. The cost of the
photographs shall be the responsibility of the applicant. The
sheriff is authorized to take the photograph of the applicant for
purposes of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and, if such photographs
Req. No. 15954 Page 7

are taken by the sheriff, the cost of the photographs shall not
exceed Ten Dollars ($10.00) for the two photos. All money received
by the sheriff from photographing applicants pursuant to the
provisions of this paragraph shall be retained by the sheriff and
deposited into the Sheriff's Service Fee Account;
7. 6. The sheriff shall witness the signature of the applicant
and review or take the photographs of the applicant and shall verify
that the person making application for a handgun license is the same
person in the photographs submitted and the same person who signed
the application form. Proof of a valid Oklahoma driver license with
a photograph of the applicant or an Oklahoma state photo
identification for the applicant shall be required to be presented
by the applicant to the sheriff for verification of the person's
identity of the applicant;
8. 7. Upon verification of the identity of the applicant, the
sheriff shall take two complete sets of fingerprints of the
applicant. Both sets of fingerprints shall be submitted by the
sheriff with the completed application, certificate of training,
certificate of competency and qualification or an exemption from
training certificate, photographs and processing fee to the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Investigation within fourteen (14) days of taking
the fingerprints. The cost of the fingerprints shall be paid by the
applicant. The sheriff may charge a fee of up to Twenty-five
Dollars ($25.00) for the two sets of fingerprints. All fees
Req. No. 15954 Page 8

coll ected by the sheriff from taking fingerprints pursuant to the
provisions of this paragraph shall be retained by the sheriff and
deposited into the Sheriff's Service Fee Account;
9. 8. The sheriff shall submit to the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation within the fourteen-day period, together with the
completed application, including the certificate of training,
certificate of competency and qualification, exemption from training
certificate, photographs, processing fee and legible fingerprints
meeting the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation's Automated
Fingerprint Identification System (AFIS) submission standards, and a
report of information deemed pertinent to an investigation of the
applicant for a handgun license. The sheriff shall make a
preliminary investigation of pertinent information about the
applicant and the court clerk shall assist the sheriff in locating
pertinent information in court records for this purpose. If no
pertinent information is found to exist either for or against the
applicant, the sheriff shall so indicate in the report;
10. 9. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, upon receipt
of the application and required information from the sheriff, shall
forward one full set of fingerprints of the applicant to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history records
search. The cost of processing the fingerprints nationally shall be
paid from the processing fee collected by the Oklahoma State Bureau
of Investigation;
Req. No. 15954 Page 9

11. 10. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-
Defense Act, or any other provisions of law, any person who has been
granted a permanent victim protective order by the court, as
provided for in the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act, may be
issued a temporary handgun license for a period not to exceed six
(6) months. A temporary handgun license may be issued if the person
has successfully passed the required weapons course, completed the
application process for the handgun license, passed the preliminary
investigation by the sheriff and court clerk, and provided the
sheriff proof of a certified permanent victim protective order and a
valid Oklahoma state photo identification card or driver license.
The sheriff shall issue a temporary handgun license on a form
approved by the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, at no cost.
Any person who has been issued a temporary license shall carry the
temporary handgun license and a valid Oklahoma state photo
identification on his or her person at all times, and shall be
subject to all the requirements of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act
when carrying a handgun. The person may proceed with the handgun
licensing process. In the event the victim protective order is no
longer enforceable, the temporary handgun license shall cease to be
valid;
12. 11. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall make a
reasonable effort to investigate the information submitted by the
applicant and the sheriff to ascertain whether or not the issuance
Req. No. 15954 Page 10

of a handgun license would be in violation of the provisions of the
Oklahoma Self-Defense Act. The investigation by the Bureau of an
applicant shall include, but shall not be limited to: a statewide
criminal history records search, a national criminal history records
search, a Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint search, a
check of the National Instant Criminal Background Check System
(NICS), an Immigration Alien Query (IAQ) for non-United-States
citizens and, if applicable, an investigation of medical records or
other records or information deemed by the Bureau to be relevant to
the application.
a. In the course of the investigation by the Bureau, it
shall present the name of the applicant along with any
known aliases, the address of the applicant and the
Social Security number of the applicant to the
Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services. The Department of Mental Health and
Substance Abuse Services shall respond within ten (10)
days of receiving such information to the Bureau as
follows:
(1) with a "Yes" answer, if the records of the
Department indicate that the person was
involuntarily committed to a mental institution
in Oklahoma,

Req. No. 15954 Page 11

(2) with a "No" answer, if there are no records
indicating the name of the person as a person
involuntarily committed to a mental institution
in Oklahoma, or
(3) with an "Inconclusive" answer if the records of
the Department suggest the applicant may be a
formerly committed person. In the case of an
inconclusive answer, the Bureau shall ask the
applicant whether he or she was involuntarily
committed. If the applicant states under penalty
of perjury that he or she has not been
involuntarily committed, the Bureau shall
continue processing the application for a
license.
b. In the course of the investigation by the Bureau, it
shall check the name of any applicant who is twenty-
eight (28) years of age or younger along with any
known aliases, the address of the applicant and the
Social Security number of the applicant against the
records in the Juvenile Online Tracking System (JOLTS)
of the Office of Juvenile Affairs. The Office of
Juvenile Affairs shall provide the Bureau direct
access to check the applicant against the records
available on JOLTS:
Req. No. 15954 Page 12

(1) if the Bureau finds a record on JOLTS that
indicates the person was adjudicated a delinquent
for an offense that would constitute a felony
offense if committed by an adult within the last
ten (10) years, the Bureau shall deny the
license,
(2) if the Bureau finds no record on JOLTS indicating
the named person was adjudicated delinquent for
an offense that would constitute a felony offense
if committed by an adult within the last ten (10)
years, the Bureau shall continue processing the
application for a license, or
(3) if the records suggest the applicant may have
been adjudicated delinquent for an offense that
would constitute a felony offense if committed by
an adult but such record is inconclusive, the
Bureau shall ask the applicant whether he or she
was adjudicated a delinquent for an offense that
would constitute a felony offense if committed by
an adult within the last ten (10) years. If the
applicant states under penalty of perjury that he
or she was not adjudicated a delinquent within
ten (10) years, the Bureau shall continue
processing the application for a license; and
Req. No. 15954 Page 13

13. 12. If the background check set forth in paragraph 12 11 of
this subsection reveals no records pertaining to the applicant, the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall either issue a handgun
license or deny the application within sixty (60) days of the date
of receipt of the applicant's completed application and the required
information from the sheriff. In all other cases, the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Investigation shall either issue a handgun license
or deny the application within ninety (90) days of the date of the
receipt of the applicant's completed application and the required
information from the sheriff. The Bureau shall deny a license when
the applicant fails to properly complete the application form or
application process or, based on the background check set forth in
paragraph 12 11 of this subsection, is determined not to be eligible
as specified by the provisions of Section 1290.9, 1290.10 or 1290.11
of this title. The Bureau shall approve an application in all other
cases. If an application is denied, the Bureau shall notify the
applicant in writing of its decision. The notification shall state
the grounds for the denial and inform the applicant of the right to
an appeal as may be provided by the provisions of the Administrative
Procedures Act. All notices of denial shall be mailed by first-
class mail to the address of the applicant listed in the
application. Within sixty (60) calendar days from the date of
mailing a denial of application to an applicant, the applicant shall
notify the Bureau in writing of the intent to appeal the decision of
Req. No. 15954 Page 14

deni al or the right of the applicant to appeal shall be deemed
waived. Any administrative hearing on a denial which may be
provided shall be conducted by a hearing examiner appointed by the
Bureau. The decision of the hearing examiner shall be a final
decision appealable to a district court in accordance with the
Administrative Procedures Act. When an application is approved, the
Bureau shall issue the license and shall mail the license by first-
class mail to the address of the applicant listed in the
application.
B. Nothing contained in any provision of the Oklahoma Self-
Defense Act shall be construed to require or authorize the
registration, documentation or providing of serial numbers with
regard to any firearm. For purposes of the Oklahoma Self-Defense
Act, the sheriff may designate a person to receive, fingerprint,
photograph or otherwise process applications for handgun licenses.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.14, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 156, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1290.14), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1290.14.
SAFETY AND TRAINING COURSE
A. Each applicant for a license to carry a concealed or
unconcealed handgun pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act must
successfully shall have the option to complete a firearms safety and
training course in this state conducted by a registered and approved
Req. No. 15954 Page 15

fire arms instructor as provided by the provisions of this section or
from an interactive online firearms safety and training course
available electronically via the Internet approved and certified by
the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training. The
applicant must further demonstrate competence and qualification with
an authorized pistol to carry as a concealed or unconcealed handgun
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, except
certain persons may be exempt from such training requirement as
provided by the provisions of Section 1290.15 of this title.
B. The Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training
(CLEET) shall establish criteria for approving firearms instructors
and interactive online firearms safety and training courses
available electronically via the Internet for purposes of training
and qualifying individuals for a handgun license pursuant to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act. Prior to submitting an
application for CLEET approval as a firearms instructor, applicants
shall attend a firearms instructor school, meeting the following
minimum requirements:
1. Firearms instructor training conducted by one of the
following entities:
a. Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training,
b. National Rifle Association,
c. Oklahoma Rifle Association,
d. federal law enforcement agencies, or
Req. No. 15954 Page 16

e. other professionally recognized organizations;
2. The course shall be at least sixteen (16) hours in length;
3. Upon completion of the course, the applicant shall be
qualified to provide instruction on pistols; and
4. Receive a course completion certificate.
All firearms instructors shall be required to meet the
eligibility requirements for a handgun license as provided in
Sections 1290.9, 1290.10, and 1290.11 of this title and the
application shall be processed as provided for applicants in Section
1290.12 of this title, including the state and national criminal
history records search and fingerprint search. A firearms
instructor shall be required to pay a fee of One Hundred Dollars
($100.00) to the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training
(CLEET) each time the person makes application for CLEET approval as
a firearms instructor pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma
Self-Defense Act. The fee shall be retained by CLEET and shall be
deposited into the Firearms Instructors Revolving Fund. CLEET shall
promulgate the rules, forms and procedures necessary to implement
the approval of firearms instructors as authorized by the provisions
of this subsection. CLEET shall periodically review each approved
instructor during a training and qualification course to assure
compliance with the rules and course contents. Any violation of the
rules may result in the revocation or suspension of CLEET and
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation approval. Unless the
Req. No. 15954 Page 17

appr oval has been revoked or suspended, a firearms instructor's
CLEET approval shall be for a term of five (5) years. CLEET shall
be responsible for notifying all approved firearms instructors of
statutory and policy changes related to the Oklahoma Self-Defense
Act. A firearms instructor shall not be required to submit his or
her fingerprints for a fingerprint search when renewing a firearms
instructor's CLEET approval.
C. 1. All firearms instructors approved by CLEET to train and
qualify individuals for a handgun license shall be required to apply
for registration with the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation
after receiving CLEET approval. All firearms instructors teaching
the approved course for a handgun license must display their
registration certificate during each training and qualification
course. Each approved firearms instructor shall complete a
registration form provided by the Bureau and shall have the option
to pay a registration fee of either One Hundred Dollars ($100.00)
for a five-year registration certificate or Two Hundred Dollars
($200.00) for a ten-year registration certificate to the Bureau at
the time of each application for registration, except as provided in
paragraph 2 of this subsection. Registration certificates issued by
the Bureau shall be valid for a period of five (5) years or ten (10)
years from the date of issuance. The Bureau shall issue a five-year
or ten-year handgun license to an approved firearms instructor at
the time of issuance of a registration certificate and no additional
Req. No. 15954 Page 18

fee shall be required or charged. The Bureau shall maintain a
current listing of all registered firearms instructors in this
state. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to eliminate
the requirement for registration and training with CLEET as provided
in subsection B of this section. Failure to register or be trained
as required shall result in a revocation or suspension of the
instructor certificate by the Bureau.
2. Registered instructors listed in subparagraphs a and b of
this paragraph shall not be required to renew the firearms
instructor registration certificate with the Oklahoma State Bureau
of Investigation at the expiration of the registration term,
provided the instructor is not subject to any suspension or
revocation of the firearms instructor certificate. The firearms
instructor registration with the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation shall automatically renew together with the handgun
license authorized in paragraph 1 of this subsection for an
additional five-year term and no additional cost or fee may be
charged for the following individuals:
a. an active duty law enforcement officer of this state
or any of its political subdivisions or of the federal
government who has a valid CLEET approval as a
firearms instructor pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-
Defense Act, and

Req. No. 15954 Page 19

b. a retired law enforcement officer authorized to carry
a firearm pursuant to Section 1289.8 of this title who
has a valid CLEET approval as a firearms instructor
pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act.
D. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall approve
registration for a firearms instructor applicant who is in full
compliance with CLEET rules regarding firearms instructors and the
provisions of subsection B of this section, if completion of the
federal fingerprint search is the only reason for delay of
registration of that firearms instructor applicant. Upon receipt of
the federal fingerprint search information, if the Bureau receives
information which precludes the person from having a handgun
license, the Bureau shall revoke both the registration and the
handgun license previously issued to the firearms instructor.
E. The required optional firearms safety and training course
and the actual demonstration of competency and qualification
required of the applicant shall be designed and conducted in such a
manner that the course can be reasonably completed by the applicant
within an eight-hour period. CLEET shall establish the course
content and promulgate rules, procedures and forms necessary to
implement the provisions of this subsection. For the firearms
safety and training and qualification course, an applicant may be
charged a fee which shall be determined by the instructor or entity
that is conducting the course. The maximum class size shall be
Req. No. 15954 Page 20

dete rmined by the instructor conducting the course; provided,
however, practice shooting sessions shall not have more than ten
participating students at one time. CLEET may establish criteria
for assistant instructors and any other requirements deemed
necessary to conduct a safe and effective firearms safety and
training and qualification course. The course content shall include
a safety inspection of the firearm to be used by the applicant in
the training course; instruction on pistol handling, safety and
storage; dynamics of ammunition and firing; methods or positions for
firing a pistol; information about the criminal provisions of the
Oklahoma law relating to firearms; the requirements of the Oklahoma
Self-Defense Act as it relates to the applicant; self-defense and
the use of appropriate force; a practice shooting session; and a
familiarization course. The firearms instructor shall refuse to
train or qualify any person when the pistol to be used or carried by
the person is either deemed unsafe or unfit for firing or is a
weapon not authorized by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act. The course
shall provide an opportunity for the applicant to qualify himself or
herself with a pistol; provided, no pistol shall be capable of
firing larger than .45 caliber ammunition. Any applicant who
successfully trains and qualifies himself or herself with a pistol
shall be approved by the firearms instructor on the training
certificate. Upon successful completion of the firearms safety and
training and qualification course, a certificate of training and a
Req. No. 15954 Page 21

cert ificate of competency and qualification shall be issued to each
applicant who successfully completes the course. The certificate of
training and certificate of competency and qualification shall
comply with the forms established by CLEET and shall be submitted
with an application for a handgun license pursuant to the provisions
of paragraph 2 of subsection A of Section 1290.12 of this title.
The certificate of training and certificate of competency and
qualification issued to an applicant shall be valid for a period of
three (3) years.
F. There is hereby created a revolving fund for the Council on
Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET), to be designated the
"Firearms Instructors Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all funds received for approval of firearms instructors
for purposes of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act. All funds received
shall be deposited to the fund. All monies accruing to the credit
of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended
by the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training, for
implementation of the firearms safety and training and qualification
course contents, approval of firearms instructors and any other
CLEET requirement pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-
Defense Act or as may otherwise be deemed appropriate by CLEET.
Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the
State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Req. No. 15954 Page 22

Dire ctor of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
G. Firearms instructors shall keep on file for a period of not
less than three (3) years a roster of each training class, the
safety test score of each individual, the caliber and the weapon
each individual used when qualifying and whether or not each
individual successfully completed the training course. Firearms
instructors shall be authorized to destroy all training documents
and records upon expiration of the three-year time period.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.15, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 156, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1290.15), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1290.15.
PERSONS EXEMPT FROM TRAINING COURSE
A. The following individuals may be exempt from all or part of
the required training and qualification course established pursuant
to the provisions of Section 1290.14 of this title:
1. A firearms instructor registered with the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation for purposes of the Oklahoma Self-Defense
Act;
2. An active duty or reserve duty law enforcement officer of
this state or any of its political subdivisions or of the federal
government;

Req. No. 15954 Page 23

3. A retired law enforcement officer authorized by this state
pursuant to Section 1289.8 of this title to carry a firearm;
4. A Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET)
certified armed security officer, armed guard, correctional officer,
or any other person having a CLEET certification to carry a firearm
in the course of their employment;
5. A person on active military duty, National Guard duty or
regular military reserve duty who is a legal resident of this state
and who is trained and qualified in the use of handguns;
6. A person honorably discharged from active military duty,
National Guard duty or military reserves who is a legal resident of
this state;
7. A person retired as a peace officer in good standing from a
law enforcement agency located in another state, who is a legal
resident of this state, and who has received training equivalent to
the training required for CLEET certification in this state; and
8. Any person who is otherwise deemed qualified for a training
exemption by CLEET.
B. Nothing contained in any provision of the Oklahoma Self-
Defense Act shall be construed to alter, amend, or modify the
authority of any active duty law enforcement officer, or any person
certified by the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training
to carry a pistol during the course of their employment, to carry

Req. No. 15954 Page 24

any pistol in any manner authorized by law or authorized by the
employing agency.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.18, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1290.18.
APPLICATION FORM CONTENTS
The application for a handgun license shall be completed upon
the sworn oath of the applicant as provided in paragraph 5 4 of
subsection A of Section 1290.12 of this title. The application form
shall be provided by the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation and
shall contain the following information in addition to any other
information deemed relevant by the Bureau:
1. Applicant's full legal name;
2. Applicant's birth name, alias names or nicknames;
3. Applicant's maiden name, if applicable;
4. County of residence;
5. Length of residency at the current address;
6. Previous addresses for the preceding three (3) years;
7. Place of birth;
8. Date of birth;
9. Declaration of citizenship or alien or admission number for
a non-United-States citizen;
10. Race;
11. Weight;
Req. No. 15954 Page 25

12. Height;
13. Sex;
14. Color of eyes;
15. Current driver license number;
16. Military service number, if applicable;
17. Law enforcement identification numbers, if applicable;
18. Current occupation;
19. Authorized type or types of pistol for which the applicant
qualified as stated on the certificate of training or exemption of
training which shall be stated as either derringer, revolver,
semiautomatic pistol, or some combination of derringer, revolver and
semiautomatic pistol and the maximum ammunition capacity of the
firearm shall be .45 caliber;
20. An acknowledgment that the applicant desires a handgun
license as a means of lawful self-defense and self-protection and
for no other intent or purpose;
21. 20. A statement that the applicant has never been convicted
of any felony offense in this state, another state or pursuant to
any federal offense;
22. 21. A statement that the applicant has none of the
conditions which would preclude the issuing of a handgun license
pursuant to any of the provisions of Sections 1290.10 and 1290.11 of
this title and that the applicant further meets all of the
eligibility criteria required by Section 1290.9 of this title;
Req. No. 15954 Page 26

23. 22. An authorization for the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation to investigate the applicant and any or all records
relating to the applicant for purposes of approving or denying a
handgun license pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-
Defense Act;
24. 23. An acknowledgment that the applicant has reviewed the
Federal Bureau of Investigation Privacy Act Statement and the
Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and is knowledgeable about its provisions;
25. A statement that the applicant is the identical person who
completed the firearms training course for which the original
training certificate is submitted as part of the application or a
statement that the applicant is the identical person who is exempt
from firearms training for which the original exemption certificate
is submitted as part of the application, whichever is applicable to
the applicant;
26. 24. A conspicuous warning that the application is executed
upon the sworn oath of the applicant and that any false or
misleading answer to any question or the submission of any false
information or documentation by the applicant is punishable by
criminal penalty as provided in paragraph 5 4 of subsection A of
Section 1290.12 of this title;
27. 25. A signed verification that the contents of the
application are known to the applicant and are true and correct;

Req. No. 15954 Page 27

28. 26. Two separate places for the original signature of the
applicant;
29. 27. A place for attachment of a passport-sized photograph
of the applicant; and
30. 28. A place for the signature and verification of the
identity of the applicant by the sheriff or the sheriff's designee.
Information provided by the person on an application for a
handgun license shall be confidential except to law enforcement
officers or law enforcement agencies.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15954 GRS 01/20/26












Req. No. 15954 Page 28